Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.031

Management of permanent funds—Procedural policies—Limitation on purchase, sale or exchange prices for securities.

Subject to the limitation of authority delegated by RCW 43.84.031 through 43.84.061 and RCW 43.84.150, the state investment board shall adopt procedural policies governing the management of said permanent trust funds.

[ 1981 c 3 s 17; 1973 1st ex.s. c 103 s 5; 1965 ex.s. c 104 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 103: See note following RCW 2.10.080.

State investment board: Chapter 43.33A RCW.